test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-I-I-sokapii_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - soka'pii - ok : # -m inanimate intransitive verb, good AEW NA1
     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Ind+0Sg: iikssoka'piiwa
     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Ind+0Pl: iikssoka'piiyi
     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Ind+0Sg+INTERR: iikssoka'piiwaatskiksi
     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Ind+0Pl+INTERR: iikssoka'piiwaaistsaawa
     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Ind+PRO+0Sg: iikssoka'piiwaawa
     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Ind+PRO+0Pl: iikssoka'piiyiwaistsi

     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Cnj+0Sg: otsiikssoka'piihsi
     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Cnj+0Pl: otsiikssoka'piihsi
     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Cnj+0Sg: otsiikssoka'piihsiaawa
     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Cnj+0Pl: otsiikssoka'piihsiwaistsi

     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Sbj+0Sg: otsiikssoka'piisi
     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Sbj+0Pl: otsiikssoka'piisi
     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Sbj+0Sg: otsiikssoka'piisiaawa
     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Sbj+0Pl: otsiikssoka'piisiwaistsi

     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Irr+0Sg: iikssoka'piiwahtohpi
     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Irr+0Pl: iikssoka'piiwahtopiyi
     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Irr+0Sg: iikssoka'piiwahtohpiaawa
     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Irr+0Pl: iikssoka'piiwahtopiyiwaistsi
